North Carolina statutes. Chapter 73. Mills.
Article 3. Condemnation for Races, Waterways, etc., by Owner of Mill or Millsite. [Repealed]

§§ 73-14 through 73-22.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1981, c. 919, s. 9.

Cross References.

For present provisions as to eminent domain, see Chapter 40A.

§ 73-23.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 108, s. 25.

§ 73-24.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1981, c. 919, s. 9.